Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 10. Wyoming Tourism Board

Editor's notes. —

This article was originally designated as Article 9, W.S.

9-12-901

and

9-12-902

, as enacted by Laws 2007, ch. 5, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, and were subsequently redesignated by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office, pursuant to W.S.

8-1-105

.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 5, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 9-12-1001.
Wyoming tourism board; creation; composition; appointment; terms; compensation.

There is created the Wyoming tourism board. The board shall serve as the leading proponent of Wyoming’s tourism and hospitality industry and shall provide governance and oversight for the division of travel and tourism.

The board shall be comprised of nine (9) members who shall be employed in or associated closely with the travel industry. The board shall be appointed by the governor, and approved with the advice and consent of the senate, in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

, as follows:

One (1) member shall be from tourism appointment district 1, consisting of Albany, Carbon and Laramie counties;

One (1) member shall be from tourism appointment district 2, consisting of Converse, Goshen, Natrona, Niobrara and Platte counties;

One (1) member shall be from tourism appointment district 3, consisting of Campbell, Crook, Johnson, Sheridan and Weston counties;

One (1) member shall be from tourism appointment district 4, consisting of Lincoln, Sweetwater and Uinta counties;

One (1) member shall be from tourism appointment district 5, consisting of Big Horn, Hot Springs, Park and Washakie counties;

One (1) member shall be from tourism appointment district 6, consisting of Fremont, Sublette and Teton counties;

Three (3) members shall be at-large members appointed to provide geographic and tourism industry balance.

Each appointed member shall serve for three (3) years, except that the initial appointments of the members shall be:

One (1) year for one (1) of the at-large members and the members appointed from tourism appointment district 2 and tourism appointment district 5;

Two (2) years for one (1) of the at-large members and the members appointed from tourism appointment district 1 and tourism appointment district 3; and

Three (3) years for one (1) of the at-large members and the members appointed from tourism appointment district 4 and tourism appointment district 6.

No appointed member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive three (3) year terms.

The board shall select a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its members.

The governor may remove any member as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

.

Members of the board shall receive mileage and per diem for attending board meetings or other meetings as assigned by the board, in the same amount as state legislators and shall receive no other compensation for serving on the board.

For purposes of this article, “board” means the Wyoming tourism board.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 9-12-1002.
General powers and duties of the board; rulemaking authority.

The board shall be responsible for implementing the tourism program and functions assigned to the Wyoming business council under the Wyoming Economic Development Act, including the expenditure of all funds appropriated for the tourism program and shall:

Assemble and distribute information concerning the scenic and recreational opportunities and resources of Wyoming;

Encourage close cooperation between public and private agencies engaged in stimulating recognition of Wyoming recreational resources;

Implement programs to promote tourism in Wyoming; and

Administer the film industry financial incentive program as provided in W.S.

9-12-402

through 9-12-406.

The board shall assign a member to attend all regularly scheduled meetings of the Wyoming business council.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this article.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 5, § 1; 2008, ch. 6, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

added (a)(iv) and made a related change.

Laws 2008, ch. 6, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2008.

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2008, ch. 6, § 3, provides:

“(a) It is the intention and direction of the legislature that:

“(i) All duties of the business council with respect to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program be transferred to the Wyoming tourism board. All duties of the business council with respect to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program not assumed by the tourism board are terminated;

“(ii) All unexpended funds not otherwise obligated and any other property, if any, of the business council exclusively dedicated to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program be transferred to the tourism board;

“(iii) Any contract, agreement or obligation entered into or assumed by the business council with respect to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program, if the execution or assumption was within the lawful powers of the business council, be assumed by the tourism board;

“(iv) Any policy adopted by the business council with respect to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program remain in effect unaltered as policy of the tourism board until amended or repealed by the tourism board.”